Illinois, session 104th, SB1127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Youth Homelessness Prevention Subcommittee 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 60/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Youth 8Homelessness Prevention Subcommittee Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-98, eff. 1-1-20.)